Massachusetts, session 194th, H1027.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 62 of Chapter 30 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting the following definitions:-
“Near-zero-emission rail infrastructure”, any infrastructure that supports light rail, heavy
rail, regional rail, commuter rail, or intercity rail services which combine a conventional
gasoline, diesel or natural gas-powered engine with a battery that can be charged from the
electrical grid.
“Zero-emission rail infrastructure”, any infrastructure that supports light rail, heavy rail,
regional rail, commuter rail, or intercity rail services which produce zero exhaust emissions of
any pollutant or greenhouse gas under all possible operational modes or conditions.
SECTION 2. Chapter 30 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
of 2

Section 62E1/2.
(a) Notwithstanding section 62B of chapter 30 or any other general or special law to the
contrary, any project involving the construction of zero-emission or near-zero-emission rail
vehicle infrastructure, or the upgrade of infrastructure into zero-emission or near-zero-emission
rail vehicle infrastructure shall be exempted by the executive office of environmental affairs
from the requirement to produce environmental impact reports, as specified under section 62E of
chapter 30.
(b) Notwithstanding section 62B of chapter 30 or any other general or special law to the
contrary, any project involving the construction of infrastructure to power zero-emission or near-
zero-emission rail vehicles, or the upgrade of existing power infrastructure to support zero-
emission or near-zero-emission rail vehicles shall be exempted by the executive office of
environmental affairs from the requirement to produce environmental impact reports, as
specified under section 62E of chapter 30.
of 2